Utah statutes.
10-3-508.   Reconsideration.

Any action taken by the governing body may not be reconsidered or rescinded at any special meeting unless the number of members of the governing body present at the special meeting is equal to or greater than the number of members present at the meeting when the action was approved.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

